Nebraska, session 109, LB175.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB175 LB175
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 74-1335, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
74-1335 (1) For purposes of this section, successor in interest
includes any agent, successor, assignee, trustee, receiver, or other
person acquiring interests or rights in railroad land, including the
owner or holder of any servient estate or right of reversion relating to
railroad land.
(2) Whenever any person owns land on both sides of the right-of-way
of any railroad or its successor in interest, such railroad or its
successor in interest shall provide and keep in repair at least one
adequate means for such landowner to cross the right-of-way. Any
interested landowner with land on both sides of the right-of-way of any
railroad or its successor in interest may file written complaint with the
Department of Transportation against any such railroad or its successor
in interest that the crossing is not adequate or is unsafe and dangerous
to the life and property of those who use it, and the department
thereupon shall make such investigation, hold such hearing, and issue
such orders as it deems necessary, proper, and adequate. If circumstances
warrant, the department may require overhead, underground, or grade
crossings and wing fences at underground crossings or may require
existing crossings to be relocated so as to be safe to those who use
them, but when a special crossing involves an expenditure of more than
one thousand five hundred dollars, the landowner shall bear one-half the
expenses in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars.
Sec. 2. Original section 74-1335, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-